Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1027
Esthetics instructor, defined.

Esthetics instructor means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to teach any or all of the practices of esthetics in a school of cosmetology or a school of esthetics.

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-357.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 289.